Arkansas statutes. Title 21 Public Officers and Employees
Chapter 5 Compensation and Benefits
21-5-207. Office of Personnel Management — Duties.

It shall be the duty of the Office of Personnel Management to perform the following administrative responsibilities, subject to this subchapter:

To determine that each position of a state agency affected by this subchapter is allocated to a class having a written class specification based on the duties and responsibilities assigned to the position and the requirements necessary to satisfactorily perform the duties;

To assist the various state agencies in the allocation of positions to classes established in this subchapter and in the appropriation acts covering each of the several state agencies affected by this subchapter, and to disallow the allocation of a position to a class that is not in conformance with this subchapter;

To cooperate with any other state agency, department, board, commission, or institution that is not covered by this subchapter which may wish to voluntarily establish its positions into classifications in a like manner as provided in this subchapter for state agencies covered by it;

To authorize the temporary reclassification of positions in a state agency affected by this subchapter in cases in which it has been determined by the Office of Personnel Management that there are material changes in the duties and responsibilities assigned to the position when there is no available vacant position having the proper classification and where it is impracticable to restructure the duties of the position to the proper classification.

The reclassification of positions may also be authorized when it is necessary to establish a new classification to meet federal standards as a prerequisite for federal programs, provided that no position may be reclassified to a class with a higher salary grade than that approved by the General Assembly, and the reclassified positions shall not be placed in a class and receive pay at a salary rate in excess of the maximum pay level authorized for the position that was reclassified as provided in the appropriation act of the state agency;

To review all class specifications and all classes and grades and the compensation plan affecting all state agencies covered by this subchapter and to submit to the Legislative Council and the Governor in advance of the regular session and fiscal session of the General Assembly recommendations for revisions, modifications, or additions.

When necessary, the Office of Personnel Management shall confer with the staff of the Legislative Council on the development of and revisions to uniform classification and compensation systems.

Time periods for the development of recommendations and time periods for the review by the Legislative Council of those recommendations shall be as established by the Legislative Council or, if the General Assembly is in session, the Joint Budget Committee.

The time period shall be sufficiently in advance of budget hearings for the regular session and fiscal session to allow for the thorough review by the Legislative Council;

To develop and implement uniform personnel policies and procedures;

To establish a procedure to allow for the review of the qualifications of applicants whose education and experience do not meet or exceed that required by the class specification but who have other job-related qualifications which might be validly substituted for the class requirements.

This procedure is intended to allow state agencies to substitute job-related education and experience for the specific requirements stated on the class specification without the necessity for the revision of the class requirements.

The procedure shall require the final approval of the State Personnel Administrator, with the review of the Legislative Council or, if the General Assembly is in session, the Joint Budget Committee;

To monitor agency personnel transactions, including unqualified appointments, promotions, and reductions in grade.

Unqualified appointments shall be reported by the Office of Personnel Management to the Legislative Council or, if the General Assembly is in session, the Joint Budget Committee, unless one (1) of the following actions is taken:

Questionable appointments were forwarded by the Office of Personnel Management to the State Personnel Administrator for further review;

Payroll actions for questionable appointments that are determined by the State Personnel Administrator to be unqualified for the specific appointment are not processed until the unqualified appointment is removed from the payroll or is placed into a position in the state agency for which the individual meets the minimum qualifications of the classification; or

Corrective action has been documented by the state agency.

It is the specific responsibility of the director of each state agency covered by this subchapter to certify that the qualifications of persons appointed to positions within the state agency do meet or exceed the minimum education and experience requirements as stated on the class specification;

To establish each year, upon the review of the Legislative Council, new classifications at an appropriate grade level in order to meet new or changed conditions and to report at the end of each fiscal year all class titles contained in § 21-5-208 for which a class specification has not been written.

Any classification established under this subdivision (a)(9) shall remain in effect for the remainder of the fiscal year during which it was established unless specifically authorized to continue by the General Assembly as an addition to this subchapter;

To revise, as necessary, the class specification of a classification in order to ensure the accuracy of the description of the assigned duties and the minimum requirements necessary to perform these duties to maintain a valid relationship between the requirements and the duties and responsibilities of the jobs;

To administer and maintain a system for the evaluation of employee performance effectiveness;

To provide assistance to state agencies in identifying, developing, and maintaining training and resource programs;

To develop and implement, as needed, upon the review of the Legislative Council or, if the General Assembly is in session, the Joint Budget Committee, rules to ensure a uniform system of personnel administration within state government;

To review and approve both the classification and number of positions for each state agency on a biennial basis and provide a recommendation to the Legislative Council; and

To review and recommend changes to state agency personnel policies, including without limitation disciplinary policies.

In order to ensure and provide for the accuracy and efficiency of this subchapter and to provide for an efficient and equitable system of personnel management, the Office of Personnel Management, with the review of the Legislative Council or, if the General Assembly is in session, the Joint Budget Committee, is directed to:

Study on a continuing basis and modify and revise when necessary the current classifications, the class specifications, minimum requirements, and other requirements;

Create when necessary new classifications at an appropriate grade level that will accurately describe those positions for which no appropriate classification exists;

Determine those positions that are improperly classified and reclassify those positions to the appropriate classification subject to this subchapter; and

Develop and implement the policies, rules, and procedures necessary for the establishment and maintenance of this subchapter.

Amendments. The 2005 amendment deleted former (a)(13); and redesignated the remaining subdivisions accordingly.

The 2009 amendment, in (a), deleted “of the Management Division of the Department of Finance and Administration” following “Management” in the introductory language, inserted “temporary” in (a)(4)(A), deleted “of higher education” following “institution” in (a)(4)(A) and (a)(5)(A), deleted (a)(4)(C) and (a)(7), inserted “Personnel Committee of the” in present (a)(7)(C), rewrote (a)(8), substituted “each year” for “during the biennium” in (a)(9)(A), deleted “within the biennium” following “established” and substituted “fiscal year” for “biennium” in (a)(9)(B), deleted “with the review of the Legislative Council” following “as necessary” and inserted to maintain a valid relationship between the requirements and the duties and responsibilities of the jobs” in (a)(10), and substituted “Personnel Committee” for “Legislative Council” in (a)(13) and the introductory language of (b); substituted “minimum requirements, and other requirements” for “and minimum requirements” in (b)(1), and deleted “regulations” following “rules” in (b)(4); and made related and minor stylistic changes.

The 2017 amendment deleted “or institution of higher education” following “state agency” in (a)(1) and made similar changes in (a)(2)-(5); substituted “state agency” for “agency or institution” in (a)(4)(B) and made similar changes throughout the section; substituted “Office of Personnel Management” for “office” and “State Personnel Administrator” for “Personnel Director” throughout the section; substituted “Legislative Council or, if the General Assembly is in session, the Joint Budget Committee” for “Personnel Subcommittee of theLegislative Council” throughout the section and “Legislative Council” for “Personnel Subcommittee of the Legislative Council” in (a)(5)(D) and (9)(A); substituted “pay level” for “salary rate” in (a)(4)(B); substituted “uniform personnel policies and procedures” for “rules to accomplish the purposes of this subchapter” in (a)(6); rewrote (a)(8)(A); and added (a)(14) and (a)(15).

The 2019 amendment deleted “with respect to the state classification and compensation plan” following “responsibilities” in the introductory language of (a).

Cited: Briggs v. Anderson, 796 F.2d 1009 (8th Cir. 1986).

The classification titles and grades established in this section supersede the classification titles established in a state agency appropriation act using grades other than those established by this section.

This subsection is effective from July 1, 2019, through June 30, 2021.

Publisher's Notes. Former §21-5-208, concerning classification of positions, was repealed by Acts 1993, No. 708, § 1. The former section was derived from Acts 1969, No. 199, § 4; 1971, No. 750, §§ 2, 3; 1973, No. 873, §§ 3, 4; 1975, No. 932, § 1; 1977, No. 909, § 1; 1979, No. 828, § 2; 1981, No. 650, § 2; 1983, No. 931, §§ 1, 2; 1985, No. 981, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3204; Acts 1989, No. 793, § 7; 1991, No. 1148, § 3.

Amendments. The 1999 amendment rewrote this section.

The 2001 amendment redesignated former (a) as present (a)(1) and (a)(2) and added an additional one hundred and two classification titles.

The 2003 amendment by No. 923, as amended by No. 1473, rewrote this section.

The 2005 amendment rewrote this section.

The 2009 amendment deleted “of higher education” following “institutions” in (a)(1), deleted “of the fiscal biennium” following “each year” in (a)(2), and made a minor stylistic change in (a)(1); deleted “of higher education” following “various institutions” in the introductory language of (b), and rewrote the remainder of (b).

The 2011 amendment rewrote (b).

The 2013 amendment rewrote (b).

The 2015 amendment rewrote (b).

The 2017 amendment deleted (a)(2); redesignated former (a)(1) as (a); deleted “and institutions” following “agencies” in present (a); in (b), deleted “and various institutions” following “agencies” and rewrote the table; and added (c).

The 2019 amendment rewrote the table in (b); and, in (c)(2), substituted “2019” for “2017” and “2021” for “2018”.

Pay levels established in this subchapter are for compensation management purposes and are not to be construed as a contract, right, or other expectation of actual employee salary determination.

The following grades and pay levels shall be authorized for the General Salaries pay table effective July 1, 2017, and thereafter, for the state service for all positions of state agencies covered by this subchapter to which a classification title and General Salaries salary grade have been assigned in accordance with this subchapter and the appropriation act of the state agency:

The following grades and pay levels shall be authorized for the Information Technology Salaries pay table, effective July 1, 2017, and thereafter, for the state service for all positions of state agencies covered by this subchapter to which a classification title and Information Technology Salaries salary grade have been assigned in accordance with this subchapter and the appropriation act of the state agency:

The following grades and pay levels shall be authorized for the Medical Professional Salaries pay table, effective July 1, 2017, and thereafter, for the state service for all positions of state agencies covered by this subchapter to which a classification title and Medical Professional Salaries salary grade have been assigned in accordance with this subchapter and the appropriation act of the state agency:

The following grades and pay levels shall be authorized for the Senior Executive Salaries pay table, effective July 1, 2017, and thereafter, for the state service for all positions of state agencies covered by this subchapter to which a classification title and Senior Executive Salaries salary grade have been assigned in accordance with this subchapter and the appropriation act of the state agency:

It is the intent of the General Assembly that the compensation plans in this section shall be implemented and function in compliance with other provisions in this subchapter, the Regular Salary Procedures and Restrictions Act, § 21-5-101, and other fiscal control laws of this state, when applicable.

Except as provided in subdivision (g)(2) of this section, a payment of salaries shall not be made except in conformity with the maximum pay level assigned to these grades for each year as provided in the appropriation act of the state agency or in this subchapter.

With approval of the Legislative Council or, if the General Assembly is in session, the Joint Budget Committee:

The Governor may establish the salary of an agency director that is up to fifty percent (50%) above the maximum pay level for the grade assigned to the classification; and

Salaries established by this section may exceed the maximum pay level for the grade assigned to the classification by no more than twenty-five percent (25%) for no more than ten percent (10%) of the positions authorized in the state agency's appropriation act.

It is both necessary and appropriate that the General Assembly maintain oversight by requiring prior approval of the Legislative Council or, if the General Assembly is in session, the Joint Budget Committee, as provided by this subsection.

The requirement of approval by the Legislative Council or the Joint Budget Committee is not a severable part of this section. If the requirement of approval is found unconstitutional by a court of competent jurisdiction, the entire section is void.

The compensation plan and pay tables shall be reviewed by the Office of Personnel Management before each regular session of the General Assembly.

Amendments. The 2009 amendment substituted “highest pay level established for the employee's grade unless otherwise provided for in this subchapter” for “maximum for his or her grade” in (b)(1); deleted “maximum” preceding “rates of pay” in (c); inserted (d) and redesignated the subsequent subsection accordingly; rewrote (e); and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2017 amendment deleted “and institutions” following “agencies” in (a); in (b)(1), substituted “maximum pay level” for “appropriate rate” and deleted “and no employee shall be paid more than the highest pay level established for the employee's grade” preceding “unless”; deleted “or the institution” following “agency” in (c); rewrote (e); and added (g) and (h).

There is nothing in this section or §21-5-211 that would give rise to a protected property interest in promotions or pay raises; this section merely establishes a compensation plan for state agencies and institutions for the setting of salaries and salary increases where such increases are “deserved, ” and specifically provides that the intent of the section is that no pay increases shall be automatic or that any employee shall have a claim or right thereto unless the department head of the agency or the institution shall determine that the employee, by experience, ability, and work performance, has earned the increase in pay authorized for the appropriate rate. Jones v. Clinton, 974 F. Supp. 712 (E.D. Ark. 1997).

It is of no import that this section and §21-5-211 may establish a range within which an employee's salary must fall as such a requirement does not give rise to a protected property interest in a salary increase. Jones v. Clinton, 974 F. Supp. 712 (E.D. Ark. 1997).

Amendments. The 2001 amendment inserted “of the Division of Management Services of the Department of Finance and Administration” following “Personnel management” in (a); and deleted “so long as the changes do not substantially change or alter the original class specifications adopted in this subchapter” following “Legislative Council” in (b).

The 2009 amendment deleted “of higher education” following “institutions” in (a); substituted “and the changes shall be reported on a quarterly basis to the Personnel Committee of the Legislative Council” for “with the review of the Legislative Council” in (b); and made related and minor stylistic changes.

The 2017 amendment, in (a), deleted “or institutions” following the first occurrence of “agencies” and deleted “and institutions” following the second occurrence of “agencies”; and, in (b), substituted “the Office of Personnel Management” for “regulation of the office, and the changes shall be reported on a quarterly basis to the Personnel Subcommittee of the Legislative Council” and made a stylistic change.

Amendments. The 1999 amendment rewrote this section.

The 2001 amendment rewrote (b); and added (e).

The 2003 (1st Ex. Sess.) amendment rewrote (b)(1)(A)(i); inserted (b)(1)(A)(iv); deleted (b)(1)(B); redesignated former (b)(1)(C)-(G) as present (b)(1)(B)-(F); deleted “During the 2001-2002 biennium” at the beginning of present (b)(1)(D)(i); and deleted “2001-2003” preceding “biennium” in (b)(1)(D)(ii).

The 2005 amendment rewrote (b)(1)(A)(i).

The 2009 amendment, in (a), deleted “of the Division of Management Services of the Department of Finance and Administration” following “Management” in (a) and made a minor stylistic change; rewrote (b) through (d); and added (e) and (f).

The 2011 amendment substituted “Implementation” for “Implementing” in the section heading; deleted former (b); redesignated former (c) through (f) as present (b) through (e); in (b)(1)(A), substituted “2011” for “2010” and “one and eighty-six hundredths percent (1.86%)” for “two and three-tenths percent (2.3%)”; added (b)(1)(B); substituted “one and eighty-six hundredths percent (1.86%) on July 1, 2011, and the additional salary increase of two and thirty-eight hundredths percent (2.38%) on July 1, 2012” for “two and three-tenths percent (2.3%)” in (b)(2); substituted “one and eighty-six hundredths percent (1.86%) and the July 1, 2012, salary increase of two and thirty-eight hundredths percent (2.38%)” for “two and three-tenths percent (2.3%)” in (b)(4)(A).

The 2013 amendment substituted “2013” for “2011” and substituted “two percent (2%)” for “one and eighty six hundredths percent (1.86%)” throughout the section; inserted “of the Division of Management Services of the Department of Finance and Administration” in (a); deleted (b)(1)(B); deleted “and the additional salary increase of two and thirty-eight hundredths percent (2.38%) on July 1, 2012” in (b)(2); substituted the reference to “21-5-214” for “21-5-214(a)” in (b)(3);and deleted “and the July 1, 2012, salary increase of two and thirty-eight hundredths percent (2.38%)” in (b)(4)(A).

The 2014 amendment redesignated part of (b)(1) as (b)(1)(A); in (b)(1)(A), substituted “July 1, 2014” for “July 1, 2013,” “June 30, 2014” for “June 30, 2013,” and “one percent (1%)” for “two percent (2%)”; added (b)(1)(B); in (b)(2), deleted “additional” preceding “salary” and substituted “authorized by subdivision (b)(1)(A) of this section” for “of two percent (2%) on July 1, 2013”; in (b)(4)(A), substituted “July 1, 2014” for “July 1, 2013” and “one percent (1%)” for “two percent (2%)”; and, in (b)(4)(B), inserted “salary” near the beginning, substituted “2015 fiscal year” for “fiscal year of the year in which the increase is to occur,” and added “of the employee” at the end.

The 2015 amendment, in (b)(1)(A), twice substituted “2015” for “2014”; in (b)(1)(B), substituted “Ninetieth” for “Eighty Ninth,” substituted “the cost of living adjustment authorized by the Governor for all classified employees” for “one percent (1%)” and substituted “2016” for “2015”; in (b)(4)(A), substituted “July 1, 2015” for “July 1, 2014” and deleted “of one percent (1%)” following “increase”; substituted “2016” for “2015” in (b)(4)(B); inserted “including a nonclassified employee” in (c)(1); and deleted “the grade assigned to” preceding “his or her classification” in (c)(2)(A).

The 2017 amendment, in (a), substituted “has” for “shall have” and deleted “and institutions” following “state agencies”; rewrote (b); rewrote the introductory language of (c)(1); in (c)(1)(B), substituted “The salary increase” for “The additional salary increase of two percent (2%)” and deleted “unless the employee is eligible for the career pay level on the career service pay plan as established in §21-5-214” following “position”; deleted “of two percent (2%)” following “increase” in (c)(2)(A); in (d)(3), deleted “Personnel Subcommittee of the” preceding “Legislative Council” and added “or, if the General Assembly is in session, the Joint Budget Committee” at the end; and substituted “Office of Personnel Management” for “office” in (e).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 inserted “and the Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared Services” in (c)(1)(A) [now (b)(1)(A)] and throughout (d) [now (c)]; and substituted “determine” for “determines” in (c)(1)(A) [now (b)(1)(A)] and (d)(1) [now (c)(1)].

The 2019 amendment by No. 981 deleted (b) and redesignated the remaining subsections accordingly.

There is nothing in this section or §21-5-209 that would give rise to a protected property interest in promotions or pay raises; this section merely establishes an implementation procedure for grade changes and does not grant any entitlement to a salary increase, and repeatedly refers to an employee's “eligibility” for salary adjustments and merit increases based upon satisfactory performance ratings. Jones v. Clinton, 974 F. Supp. 712 (E.D. Ark. 1997).

It is of no import that this section and §21-5-209 may establish a range within which an employee's salary must fall as such a requirement does not give rise to a protected property interest in a salary increase. Jones v. Clinton, 974 F. Supp. 712 (E.D. Ark. 1997).

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning rehired or transferred employees, was repealed by Acts 2017, No. 365, § 17. The section was derived from Acts 1969, No. 199, § 7; 1971, No. 749, § 2; 1973, No. 873, § 7; 1975, No. 932, § 4; 1979, No. 828, § 4; 1981, No. 650, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3207; Acts 1989, No. 793, § 11; 1991, No. 1148, § 7; 2009, No. 688, § 10.

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning employees working late shifts, was repealed by Acts 2011, No. 1017, § 4. The section was derived from Acts 1969, No. 199, § 7; 1969, No. 663, § 1; 1971, No. 749, § 2; 1973, No. 873, § 7; 1975, No. 932, § 4; 1979, No. 828, § 4; 1981, No. 650, § 4; 1985, No. 981, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3207; Acts 1989, No. 793, § 12; 2001, No. 1461, § 6.

Prevailing labor market conditions;

An extraordinarily well-qualified candidate;

The need to retain trained, competent employees;

An employee assigned additional duties as a result of the elimination of a position by a state agency; or

To meet the requirements of state or federal laws.

The office may approve a special rate of pay under subdivision (d)(1) of this section above fifteen percent (15%) up to thirty percent (30%) above the entry pay level for the grade assigned to the classification.

The office may approve a special rate of pay pursuant to subdivision (d)(1) of this section above thirty percent (30%) up to the maximum pay level for the grade assigned to the classification after review by the Legislative Council or, if the General Assembly is in session, the Joint Budget Committee.

The office shall file a report of special rates of pay established under this subsection with the Legislative Council or, if the General Assembly is in session, the Joint Budget Committee, at the next regularly scheduled meeting following the approval.

(1)An agency director may approve special rates of pay to retain a trained, competent employee or due to the assignment of additional duties as a result of the elimination of positions by the state agency, subject to the following:

The assignment of additional duties shall be permanent and beyond the scope of work currently being performed by the employee;

The same employee may not receive a special rate of pay pursuant to this subdivision (e)(1) more than one (1) time during a biennium;

An increase for an agency director pursuant to this subdivision (e)(1) shall be initiated and approved by the Governor; and

All increases up to ten percent (10%) approved under this subdivision (e)(1) shall be reported by the state agency to the office, and increases above ten percent (10%) shall be approved by the office.

The office shall file a report of all salary increases established under this subsection with the Legislative Council or, if the General Assembly is in session, the Joint Budget Committee, at the next regularly scheduled meeting following the approval for review.

(1)(A)An employee who is promoted shall receive a salary increase up to ten percent (10%).

However, an employee's rate of pay upon promotion shall not exceed the maximum pay level of the grade assigned to the classification.

An employee who upon promotion is receiving a rate of pay below the entry pay level established for the new grade shall be adjusted to the entry pay level for that grade.

An employee who returns to a position in a classification the employee formerly occupied within a twelve-month period after promotion from the classification is eligible for a rate of pay no greater than that for which the employee would have been eligible had the employee remained in the lower-graded classification.

(1)(A)Upon demotion, an employee's pay shall be decreased by up to ten percent (10%).

However, an employee's rate of pay upon demotion shall not exceed the maximum pay level of the grade assigned to the classification.

If the employee's salary falls below the lowest entry pay level of the new grade upon demotion, his or her salary shall be adjusted to the entry pay level for the grade.

(1)If an employee accepts a new position that is a transfer, the employee may receive a change in pay, as follows:

If the employee's salary falls below the entry pay level of the new grade, then his or her salary shall be adjusted to the entry pay level for the grade; or

If a special rate of pay has been established pursuant to this section.

A transferring employee's rate of pay shall not exceed the maximum pay level of the grade assigned to the new position, unless otherwise authorized.

An employee whose salary would be above the maximum salary level of the new grade after being placed in a lower-graded position on the same pay table because the original position has expired due to lack of funding, program changes, reorganization, or withdrawal of federal grant funds may continue to be paid at the same rate as the employee was being paid in the higher-graded position upon approval of the office after seeking the review of the Legislative Council or, if the General Assembly is in session, the Joint Budget Committee.

If an employee who has been terminated for more than thirty (30) working days returns to state service, the state agency may offer up to the employee's last rate of pay not to exceed the maximum pay level established for the grade.

Upon transfer of employment between state agencies, an employee is to receive a lump-sum payment from the original state agency for any overtime that has been accrued and not been paid and for any compensatory time accrued that has not been used at the higher rate of either the:

Average regular rate of pay received by the employee during the last three (3) years of his or her employment; or

Final regular rate of pay received by the employee.

Any special rate of pay established under this section shall not affect the salary level or salary eligibility of any existing employee within the state agency.

A special rate of pay is subject to the state agency's ability to certify funding for a special rate of pay established under this section.

A state agency shall not use merit adjustment funds for a special rate of pay established under this section.

The secretary or the Governor may suspend discretionary special salary actions.

Amendments. The 2001 amendment by Nos. 963 and 1461 rewrote (1) and (2).

The 2005 amendment added present (4); and redesignated former (4) and (5) as present (5) and (6).

The 2009 amendment rewrote the section and added “and other compensation plan provisions” to the section heading.

The 2011 amendment deleted “on the professional and executive pay plan or” following “more grades” in (f)(1)(B).

The 2013 amendment deleted (a)(1) through (a)(3) at the beginning of the section and redesignated the remaining subdivisions accordingly; inserted “of 1938” preceding “29 U.S.C. § 201 et seq.” in (a)(1)(A)(iv); substituted “Office of Personnel Management ofthe Division of Management Services of the Department of Finance and Administration” for “office” in present (a)(1)(B)(iii); and changed references to subdivisions to reflect redesignations throughout the section.

The 2017 amendment rewrote the section.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared Services” for “Chief Fiscal Officer of the State” in (c)(1), (c)(2), and (n); substituted “who is promoted” for “promoted on or after July 1, 2017” in (f)(1)(A); and, in (i), substituted “whose salary would be above the maximum salary level of the new grade after being” for “who is”, and inserted “reorganization”.

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning certified public school employees, was repealed by Acts 1991, No. 1148, § 12. The section was derived from Acts 1969, No. 199, § 5; 1983, No. 671, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3205; Acts 1989, No. 793, § 14.

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning Step 8 eligibility, was repealed by Acts 1993, No. 708, § 2. The section was derived from Acts 1977, No. 909, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3204.3; Acts 1989, No. 793, § 15.

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning the employment of Public Information Officers, was repealed by Acts 1991, No. 1148, § 12. The section was derived from Acts 1977, No. 909, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3204.4; Acts 1989, No. 793, § 16.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 199, § 6; 1973, No. 873, §§ 1, 5, 6; 1975, No. 932, § 3; 1979, No. 828, § 3; 1981, No. 650, § 3; 1981, No. 695, § 3; 1983, No. 931, § 3; 1985, No. 981, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 12-3206, 12-3206.1; Acts 1989, No. 793, § 6; 1991, No. 1148, § 2; 2005, No. 1962, § 98; 2009, No. 688, § 5; 2017, No. 365, § 12; 2019, No. 981, § 3.